src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-asestaeddje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - åsest: # root for agent-noun (CG and VH)
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Nom: åsestäddje
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Gen: åsestiedje
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Acc: åsestiedjev
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ill: åsestäddjáj
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ine: åsestiedjen
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Ela: [åsestiedjest, åsestiedjes]
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Sg+Com: [åsestedjijn, åsestedjijna]
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Nom: åsestiedje
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Gen: åsestedjij
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Acc: åsestedjijt
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ill: åsestedjijda
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ine: åsestedjijn
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Ela: [åsestedjijst, åsestedjijs]
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Pl+Com: [åsestedjij, åsestedjijgum]
    åsest+N+Der/Ag+N+Ess: åsestäddjen
 
 
